ko: 식탁용 식기류 소재: 대나무; 본차이나; 황동; 주철; 세라믹; 콘크리트; 도기; 유리; 대리석; 멜라민; 금속; 플라스틱; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 도기; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 석재; 석기; 인조; 티크우드; 목재; 자막; 기타
da: Materiale til service og bestik: Bambus; Knogleporcelæn; Messing; Støbejern; Keramik; Beton; Lertøj; Glas; Marmor; Melamin; Metal; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porcelæn; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Sten; Stentøj; Syntetisk; Teaktræ; Træ; Zamak; Andet
lt-LT: Stalo įrankių medžiaga: Bambukas; Kaulinis porcelianas; Žalvaris; Ketus; Keramika; Betonas; Molis; Stiklas; Marmuras; Melaminas; Metalas; Plastikas; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Porcelianas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Akmuo; Keramikos dirbiniai; Sintetika; Tikmedžio mediena; Mediena; Zamakas; Kita
vi: Vật liệu bộ đồ ăn: Tre; Sứ xương; Đồng; Chảo gang; Gốm; Bê tông; Đồ đất nung; Thủy tinh; Cẩm thạch; Melamine; Kim loại; Nhựa; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Sứ; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Đá; Đồ đá; Tổng hợp; Gỗ tếch; Gỗ; Zamak; Khác
sv: Servis - material: Bambu; Benporslin; Mässing; Gjutjärn; Keramisk; Betong; Lergods; Glas; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porslin; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Sten; Stengods; Syntetisk; Teakträ; Trä; Zamak; Annat
hu: Étkészlet anyaga: Bambusz; Csontporcelán; Sárgaréz; Öntöttvas; Kerámia; Beton; Agyagedény; Üveg; Márvány; Melamin; Fém; Műanyag; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Porcelán; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Kő; Kőedény; Szintetikus; Tíkfa; Fa; Zamak; Egyéb
it: Materiale per stoviglie: Bamboo; Porcellana fine; Ottone; Ghisa; Ceramica; Calcestruzzo; Terracotta; Vetro; Marmo; Melammina; Metallo; Plastica; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Porcellana; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Pietra; Gres porcellanato; Sintetico; Legno di teak; Legno; Zamak; Altro
bg-BG: Материал на посудата за хранене: Бамбук; Костен порцелан; Месинг; Чугун; Керамика; Бетон; Фаянс; Стъкло; Мрамор; Меламин; Метал; Пластмаса; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Порцелан; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Камък; Каменина; Синтетичен; Тиково дърво; Дърво; Zamak; Други
pt-BR: Material de talheres: Bambu; Porcelana óssea; Latão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Concreto; Louça de barro; Vidro; Mármore; Melamina; Metal; Plástico; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Porcelana; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Grés; Sintético; Madeira de teca; Madeira; Zamac; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál stolového riadu: Bambus; Kostný porcelán; Mosadz; Liatina; Keramika; Betón; Kamenina; Sklo; Mramor; Melamín; Kov; Plast; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Kameň; Kamenina; Syntetika; Teakové drevo; Drevo; Zamak; Iné
ru: Материал столовой посуды: Бамбук; Костяной фарфор; Латунь; Чугун; Керамика; Бетон; Фаянс; Стеклянные; Мрамор; Меламин; Металл; Пластик; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Фарфор; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Камень; Керамика; Синтетика; Тиковое дерево; Дерево; Замак; Другое
zh-CN: 餐具材质: 竹子; 骨瓷; 黄铜; 铸铁; 陶瓷制品; 混凝土; 陶制; 玻璃; 大理石; 三聚氰胺; 金属; 塑料; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 瓷器; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 石头; 瓷器; 合成; 柚木材; 木头; 锌合金; 其他
ja: 食器素材: バンブー; ボーンチャイナ; 真鍮; 鋳鉄; セラミック; コンクリート; 土器; ガラス; 大理石; メラミン; 金属; プラスチック; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); 磁器; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; スチール; 石; ストーンウェア; 合成品; チーク材; 木材; ザマック; その他
de: Geschirrmaterial: Bambus; Knochenporzellan; Messing; Gusseisen; Keramik; Beton; Töpferware; Glas; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Kunststoff; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porzellan; Silikon; Edelstahl; Stahl; Stein; Steinzeug; Synthetisch; Teakholz; Holz; Zamak; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 餐具材質: 竹子; 骨瓷; 黃銅; 鑄鐵; 陶瓷; 實心; 陶器; 玻璃; 大理石; 三聚氰胺; 金屬; 塑膠; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 陶瓷; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 石頭; 石炻; 合成; 柚木材; 木材; 鋅合金; 其他
nl: Materiaal servies: Bamboe; Beenderporselein; Messing; Gietijzer; Keramiek; Beton; Aardewerk; Glas; Marmer; Melamine; Metaal; Plastic; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Porselein; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Steen; Steengoed; Synthetisch; Teakhout; Hout; Zamak; Andere
tr: Sofra malzemesi: Bambu; Kemik porselen; Pirinç; Dökme demir; Seramik; Beton; Toprak kaplar; Cam; Mermer; Melamin; Metal; Plastik; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Porselen; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Taş; Ta işi; Sentetik; Tik ağacı; Ahşap; Zamak; Diğer
en: Tableware material: Bamboo; Bone china; Brass; Cast iron; Ceramic; Concrete; Earthenware; Glass; Marble; Melamine; Metal; Plastic; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Porcelain; Silicone; Stainless steel; Steel; Stone; Stoneware; Synthetic; Teak wood; Wood; Zamak; Other
sl-SI: Material namizne posode: Bambus; Kostni porcelan; Medenina; Lito železo; Keramika; Beton; Lončenina; Steklo; Marmor; Melamin; Kovina; Plastika; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Porcelan; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Kamen; Kamenina; Sintetika; Tikov les; Les; Zamak; Drugo
nb: Borddekningsmateriale: Bambus; Benporselen; Messing; Støpejern; Keramikk; Betong; Fajanse; Glass; Marmor; Melamin; Metall; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porselen; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Stein; Steintøy; Syntetisk; Teaktre; Trevirke; Zamak; Annen
pl: Materiał zastawy stołowej: Bambus; Porcelana kostna; Mosiądz; Żeliwo; Ceramika; Beton; Fajans; Szkło; Marmur; Melamina; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Porcelana; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Kamień; Wyroby kamionkowe; Syntetyczne; Drewno tekowe; Drewno; Znal; Pozostałe
fi: Pöytäastiamateriaali: Bambu; Luuposliini; Messinki; Valurauta; Keraaminen; Betoni; Keramiikka; Lasi; Marmori; Melamiini; Metalli; Muovi; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Posliini; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Kivi; Kivitavara; Synteettinen; Tiikkipuu; Puu; Zamak; Muu
ro-RO: Material veselă: Bambus; Porțelan alb; Alamă; Fontă; Ceramică; Beton; Faianță; Sticlă; Marmură; Melamină; Metal; Plastic; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Porțelan; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Piatră; Gresie ceramică; Sintetic; Lemn de tec; Lemn; Zamak; Altele
fr: Matériau de la vaisselle: Bambou; Os à mâcher; Laiton; Fonte; Céramique; Béton; Faïence; Verre; Marbre; Mélamine; Métal; Plastique; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Porcelaine; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Pierre; Grès fin; Synthétique; Bois de teck; Bois; Zamak; Autre
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องใช้บนโต๊ะอาหาร: ไผ่; โบนไชน่า; ทองเหลือง; เหล็กหล่อ; เซรามิก; คอนกรีต; เครื่องปั้นดินเผา; แก้ว; หินอ่อน; เมลามีน; โลหะ; พลาสติก; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); พอร์ซเลน; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; หิน; สโตนแวร์; สังเคราะห์; ไม้สัก; ไม้; Zamak; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal posuđa: Bambus; Koštani porculan; Mjed; Lijevano željezo; Keramika; Beton; Zemljano posuđe; Staklo; Mramor; Melamin; Metal; Plastika; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Porculan; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Kamen; Kameno posuđe; Sintetika; Tikovina; Drvo; Zamak; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material da louça de mesa: Bambu; Porcelana de osso; Latão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Betão; Faiança; Vidro; Mármore; Melamina; Metal; Plástico; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Faiança; Sintético; Madeira de teca; Madeira; Zamak; Outro
cs: Materiál nádobí: Bambus; Kostní porcelán; Mosaz; Železná litina; Keramika; Beton; Kamenina; Sklo; Mramor; Melamin; Kov; Plast; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Kámen; Kamenina; Syntetické; Týkové dřevo; Dřevo; Zamak; Jiné
el: Υλικό επιτραπέζιου σκεύους: Μπαμπού; Κόκκαλο Κίνα; Ορείχαλκος; Χυτοσίδηρος; Κεραμικό; Σκυρόδεμα; Πήλινα σκεύη; Γυαλί; Μάρμαρο; Μελαμίνη; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Πορσελάνη; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Πέτρα; Πήλινα; Συνθετικό; Ξύλο τικ; Ξύλο; Ζαμάκ; Άλλο
es: Material de vajilla: Bambú; Loza de hueso; Latón; Hierro fundido; Cerámica; Hormigón; Cerámica; Vidrio; Mármol; Melamina; Metal; Plástico; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Piedra; Loza; Sintético; Madera de teca; Madera; Zamak; Otros